Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 13 PLATS AND VACATIONS
§ 50-1332. Setting interior monuments after recording of plat — Bond or cash deposit required — Release of bond — Return of cash deposit — Payment for survey work — County surveyor performing survey work.

If the interior monuments for a subdivision are to be set on or before a specified date after the recording of the plat of the subdivision, the person subdividing the land described in the plat shall furnish, prior to recording the plat, to the governing body of the city or county which approved the plat, either a bond or cash deposit, at the option of the governing body, in an amount equal to one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the estimated cost of performing the work for the interior monumentation. The estimated cost of performing such work will be determined by the professional land surveyor signing the plat.

If the person subdividing the land described in subsection (1) of this section pays the professional land surveyor for performing the interior monumentation work and notifies the governing body of such payment, the governing body, within two (2) months after such notice, shall release the bond or return the cash deposit upon a finding that such payment has been made. Upon written request from the person subdividing the land, the governing body may pay the professional land surveyor from moneys within a cash deposit or bond held by it for such purpose and return the excess amount of the cash deposit, if any, to such person.

In the event of the inability, refusal or failure of such professional land surveyor to set the interior monuments for a subdivision, the governing body may direct the county surveyor in his official capacity or contract with a professional land surveyor in private practice to set such monuments and reference such monuments for recording as provided in section 50-1333, Idaho Code. Payment of the fees of a county surveyor or professional land surveyor in private practice performing such work shall be made as otherwise provided in this section. In the event the professional land surveyor signing the plat performed his services pursuant to a contract between the person subdividing the land and a business entity possessing a certificate of authorization, as required in this chapter, and the professional land surveyor is unable, refuses or fails to set the interior monuments for a subdivision, a substitute professional land surveyor employed by the same business entity may assume responsible charge for the remainder of the project and set the monuments, as provided in this chapter, and the governing body shall not direct the county surveyor or contract with a professional land surveyor in private practice to set such monuments.

In the event any interior monument cannot be placed at the location shown on the plat, the professional land surveyor shall place a witness corner or reference point and he shall file a record of survey as provided in chapter 19, title 55, Idaho Code, to show the location of any witness corner or reference point in relation to the platted location of the corner. In the event the professional land surveyor signing the plat does not set the interior monuments for a subdivision, the substitute professional land surveyor shall file a record of survey as provided in chapter 19, title 55, Idaho Code, to show which monuments were set by which professional land surveyor.

§ 50-1333. Recording of plats with only exterior monuments referenced.

If the person subdividing any land has complied with subsection (1) of section 50-1332, Idaho Code, the professional land surveyor may prepare the plat of the subdivision for recording with only the exterior monuments set thereon when submitted for recording. There shall be a certification on the plat by the professional land surveyor that the interior monuments for the subdivision will be set in accordance with section 50-1303, Idaho Code, on or before a specified date and the said interior monuments will be referenced on the plat with a unique symbol. The time for setting the interior monuments shall not exceed one (1) calendar year from the date the plat is recorded or as determined by the governing body of such city or county.

After the interior monuments for a subdivision have been set as provided in the certification required on the plat in subsection (1) of this section, the professional land surveyor performing such work shall, within five (5) days after completion of such work, give written notice to the person subdividing the land involved, the surveyor or engineer of the city or county by which the subdivision was approved and the governing body of such city or county.

In the event that the person subdividing the land involved fails or refuses to authorize the payment for interior monumentation, the professional land surveyor may request payment from the governing body, and upon inspection by the governing body of the interior monumentation, the governing body shall pay the professional land surveyor from moneys held.

§ 50-1334. Review of water systems encompassed by plats.

Whenever any plat is subject to the terms and requirements of sections 50-1326 through 50-1329, Idaho Code, no person shall offer for recording, or cause to be recorded, a plat unless he or she shall have certified that at least one (1) of the following is the case:

The individual lots described in the plat will not be served by any water system common to one (1) or more of the lots, but will be served by individual wells.

All of the lots in the plat will be eligible to receive water service from an existing water system, be the water system municipal, a water district, a public utility subject to the regulation of the Idaho public utilities commission, or a mutual or nonprofit water company, and the existing water distribution system has agreed in writing to serve all of the lots in the subdivision.

If a new water system will come into being to serve the subdivision, that it has or will have sufficient contributed capital to allow the water system’s wells, springboxes, reservoirs and mains to be constructed to provide service without further connection charges or fees to the landowners of the lots, except for connection of laterals, meters or other plant exclusively for the lot owner’s own use.

Failure to comply with this section is a misdemeanor subject to the provisions of section 50-1329, Idaho Code. The certification must be filed or recorded as part of the plat document preserved for public inspection. Property owners in the area encompassed by the plat will be entitled to the benefits of the third provision of this section when that option is chosen.